Tennessee, session 114, SB0192.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 57-9-101(c), is amended by deleting
the language "two (2) credible witnesses" and substituting instead "one (1) credible witness".
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB0192
000947
- 1 -